Washington statutes.
RCW 36.53.090

Commissioners may fix and alter rates.

The boards of county commissioners may fix, alter, and establish from time to time, the rates of ferriage to be levied and collected at all ferries established by law, within or bordering upon the county lines of any of the counties in this state.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.53.090. Prior: Code 1881 s 3010; 1879 p 63 s 46; 1869 p 282 s 48; RRS s 5470.]